North Carolina, session 2025, HB1219.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Madison
County Sheriff's Office may enter into memorandums of understanding with the following
sheriffs' offices located in Tennessee: Unicoi County, Greene County, and Cocke County. These
memorandums of understanding shall permit the sheriffs' offices to engage across state lines in
law enforcement special operations missions and cooperative law enforcement actions.
SECTION 1.(b) Any memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to this
section shall specify the manner in which liability claims for damage to persons or property as a
result of law enforcement special operations missions and cooperative law enforcement actions
will be shared or assigned. While ensuring public safety, each memorandum of understanding
shall limit to the greatest extent possible the liability of Madison County and the State of North
Carolina.
SECTION 1.(c) No later than November 1 of each year, any memorandum of
understanding entered into that year pursuant to this section shall be reported to the Department
of Justice.
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Madison County.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1219-v-1*